District of Columbia statutes.
Repealed

44-2009

Criteria for review and required findings.

Repealed.

Mar. 16, 1993, D.C. Law 9-197, § 10, 39 DCR 9195
Sept. 26, 1995, D.C. Law 11-52, § 808, 42 DCR 3684

History

1981 Ed., § 32-329.

Prior Codifications

See notes following § 44-2001.

Emergency Legislation